District of Columbia statutes.
10-839

Certain properties approved for disposition.

The following properties may be disposed of pursuant to § 10-831(a)(3)(A):

(1)

Square 3401, Lot 0055 (22 Farragut Place, N.W.);

(2)

Square 3401, Lot 0060 (12 Farragut Place, N.W.);

(3)

Square 4469, Lot 0053 (1145 Summit Street, N.E.);

(4)

Square 5755, Lot 0101 (1626 Galen Street, S.E.);

(5)

Square 5168, Lot 0015 (4718 Quarles Street, N.E.);

(6)

Square 5168, Lot 0015 (4720 Quarles Street, N.E.);

(7)

Square 5168, Lot 0015 (4722 Quarles Street, N.E.);

(8)

Square 5727, Lot 0811 (Buena Vista Terrace, S.E.);

(9)

Square 3401, Lot 0056 (20 Farragut Place, N.W.);

(10)

Square 3401, Lot 0058 (16 Farragut Place, N.W.);

(11)

Square 3401, Lot 0059 (14 Farragut Place, N.W.);

(12)

Square 4078, Lot 0214 (1239 16th Street, N.E.);

(13)

Square 5083, Lot 0120 (4041 Benning Road, N.E.);

(14)

Square 5176, Lot 0995 (4933 Sheriff Road, N.E.);

(15)

Square 5260, Lot 0806 (Dix Street, N.E.);

(16)

Square 5765, Lot 0853 (1650 U Street, S.E.);

(17)

Square 0362, Lot 0242 (1822 9th Street, N.W.);

(18)

Square 0362, Lot 0249 (909 S Street, N.W.);

(19)

Square 2842, Lot 0051 (1120 Park Road, N.W.);

(20)

Square 2854, Lot 0073 (1319 Harvard Street, N.W.);

(21)

Square 3038, Lot 0833 (619 Park Road, N.W.);

(22)

Square 0363, Lot 0035 (920 French Street, N.W.);

(23)

Square 0363, Lot 0075 (932 French Street, N.W.);

(24)

Square 0509, Lot 0111 (1603 5th Street, N.W.);

(25)

Square 0526, Lot 0815 (1031 4th Street, N.W.);

(26)

Square 3010, Lot 0194 (814 Delafield Place, N.W.);

(27)

Square 3210, Lot 0098 (5212 5th Street, N.W.);

(28)

Square 3237, Lot 0061 (406 Shepherd Street, N.W.);

(29)

Square 3319, Lot 0820 (223 Webster Street, N.W.);

(30)

Square 3705, Lot 0823 (Riggs Road, N.E.);

(31)

Square 0519, Lot 0041 (307 R Street, N.W.);

(32)

Square 3562, Lot 0002 (320 V Street, N.E.);

(33)

Square 3563, Lot 0108 (2023 3rd Street, N.E.);

(34)

Square 4039, Lot 0807 (964 Mount Olivet Road, N.E.);

(35)

Square 4055, Lot 0040 (N.E.);

(36)

Square 4055, Lot 0130 (N.E.);

(37)

Square 4057, Lot 0193 (1259 Holbrook Terrace, N.E.);

(38)

Square 4058, Lot 0801 (1612 Montello Avenue, N.E.);

(39)

Square 4083, Lot 0012 (1721 Holbrook Street, N.E.);

(40)

Square 4253, Lot 0818 (N.E.);

(41)

Square 4315, Lot 0814 (2616 Myrtle Avenue, N.E.);

(42)

Square 4319, Lot 0072 (N.E.);

(43)

Square 4445, Lot 0819 (18th Place, N.E.);

(44)

Square 4469, Lot 0054 (1147 Summit Street, N.E.);

(45)

Square 1550, Lot 0164 (N.E.);

(46)

Square 0776, Lot 0050 (I Street, N.E.);

(47)

Square 0836, Lot 0060 (513 E Street, N.E.);

(48)

Square 0855, Lot 0319 (655 Morton Street, N.E.);

(49)

Square 1003, Lot 0049 (1215 Wylie Street, N.E.);

(50)

Square 1003, Lot 0050 (1217 Wylie Street, N.E.);

(51)

Square 1003, Lot 0812 (1209 Wylie Street, N.E.);

(52)

Square 1029, Lot 0087 (1337 Emerald Street, N.E.);

(53)

Square 1072S, Lot 0046 (1527 Independence Avenue, S.E.);

(54)

Square 1112, Lot 0088 (1816 Bay Street, S.E.);

(55)

Square 4540, Lot 0147 (649 16th Street, N.E.);

(56)

Square 4540, Lot 0829 (647 16th Street, N.E.);

(57)

Square 5765, Lot 0884 (1648 U Street, S.E.);

(58)

Square 5801, Lot 0284 (2315 Chester Street, S.E.);

(59)

Square 5804, Lot 0195 (2321 High Street, S.E.);

(60)

Square 5045, Lot 0017 (209 35th Street, N.E.);

(61)

Square 5129, Lot 0815 (4511 Gault Place, N.E.);

(62)

Square 5150, Lot 0095 (831 46th Street, N.E.);

(63)

Square 5150, Lot 0105 (4619 Jay Street, N.E.);

(64)

Square 5154, Lot 0013 (4607 Kane Place, N.E.);

(65)

Square 5174, Lot 0022, (1109 50th Place, N.E.);

(66)

Square 5176, Lot 0989 (4906 Jay Street, N.E.);

(67)

Square 5210, Lot 0034 (5354 Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue, N.E.);

(68)

Square 5210, Lot 0035 (5354 Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue, N.E.);

(69)

Square 5210, Lot 0036 (5354 Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue, N.E.);

(70)

Square 5243, Lot 0032 (5300 East Capitol Street, N.E.);

(71)

Square 5251, Lot 0818 (Clay Place, N.E.);

(72)

Square 5298, Lot 0017 (5302 F Street, S.E.);

(73)

Square 5302, Lot 0010 (5341 C Street, S.E.);

(74)

Square 5317, Lot 0009 (5135 F Street, S.E.);

(75)

Square 5336, Lot 0029 (4919 C Street, S.E.);

(76)

Square 5340, Lot 0050 (5019 H Street, S.E.);

(77)

Square 5349, Lot 0014 (39 47th Street, S.E.);

(78)

Square 5362, Lot 0193 (4675 H Street, S.E.);

(79)

Square 5362, Lot 0194 (5001 Benning Road, S.E.);

(80)

Square 5362, Lot 0195 (5007 Benning Road, S.E.);

(81)

Square 5447, Lot 0800 (3227 D Street, S.E.);

(82)

Square 5579, Lot 0055 (S.E.);

(83)

Square 5727, Lot 0810 (Buena Vista Terrace, S.E.);

(84)

Square 5740, Lot 0028 (Ainger Place, S.E.);

(85)

Square 5740, Lot 0034 (S.E.);

(86)

Square 5740, Lot 0852 (Skyland Terrace, S.E.);

(87)

Square 5827, Lot 0010 (2302 Pomeroy Road, S.E.);

(88)

Square 5867, Lot 0174 (2808 Wade Road, S.E.);

(89)

Square 5867, Lot 0898 (Wade Road, S.E.);

(90)

Square 5936, Lot 0802 (3401 13th Street S.E.);

(91)

Square 5946, Lot 0805 (1201 Alabama Avenue, S.E.);

(92)

Square 5970, Lot 2030 (3423 5th Street, S.E. Unit 24);

(93)

Square 6158, Lot 0090 (832 Yuma Street, S.E.);

(94)

Square 6208, Lot 0048 (4250 6th Street, S.E.);

(95)

Square 6208, Lot 0054 (4238 6th Street, S.E.);

(96)

Square 6239, Lot 0060 (62 Forrester Street, S.W.);

(97)

Square 6239, Lot 0082 (105 Galveston Place, S.W.); or

(98)

Square 6240, Lot 0083 (161 Forrester Street, S.W.).

History

Apr. 2, 2003, D.C. Law 14-267, § 10, 50 DCR 420

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-831.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 10 of Abandoned and Vacant Properties Community Development Disposition, and Disapproval of Disposition of Certain Scattered Vacant and Abandoned Properties Temporary of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-203, October 17, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 10021).